Wisconsin, session 2025, AB677.
do enact as follows:AB677,13Section 1. 48.345 (3) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB677,3,6448.345 (3) (a) 2. The home of a relative other than the parent of a child or the 1home of like-kin if the judge finds that the relative or like-kin has been convicted of, 2has pleaded no contest to, or has had a charge dismissed or amended as a result of 3a plea agreement for a crime under s. 948.02 (1) or (2), 948.025, 948.03 (2) or (5) (a) 41., 2., 3., or 4., 948.05, 948.051, 948.055, 948.06, 948.07, 948.072, 948.08, 948.081, 5948.085, 948.11 (2) (a) or (am), 948.12, 948.125, 948.13, 948.21, 948.215, 948.30, or 6948.53, or a similar law of another state.AB677,27Section 2. 48.345 (3) (b) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB677,3,14848.345 (3) (b) 2. The home of a person who is not required to be licensed if the 9judge finds that the person has been convicted of, has pleaded no contest to, or has 10had a charge dismissed or amended as a result of a plea agreement for a crime 11under s. 948.02 (1) or (2), 948.025, 948.03 (2) or (5) (a) 1., 2., 3., or 4., 948.05, 12948.051, 948.055, 948.06, 948.07, 948.072, 948.08, 948.081, 948.085, 948.11 (2) (a) 13or (am), 948.12, 948.125, 948.13, 948.21, 948.215, 948.30, or 948.53, or a similar law 14of another state.AB677,315Section 3. 48.685 (1) (c) 2. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 1624, section 93, is amended to read:AB677,3,231748.685 (1) (c) 2. A violation of s. 940.01, 940.02, 940.03, 940.05, 940.12, 940.22 18(2) or (3), 940.225 (1), (2), or (3), 940.285 (2), 940.29, 940.295, 940.60 (2) or (3) (a), 19(b), or (c), 940.66 (2), 942.09 (2), 948.02 (1) or (2), 948.025, 948.03 (2) or (5) (a) 1., 2., 203., or 4., 948.05, 948.051, 948.055, 948.06, 948.07, 948.072, 948.08, 948.081, 21948.085, 948.11 (2) (a) or (am), 948.12, 948.125, 948.13, 948.21, 948.215, 948.30, or 22948.53 or s. 940.19 (2), 2023 stats., s. 940.19 (4), 2023 stats., s. 940.19 (5), 2023 23stats., s. 940.19 (6), 2023 stats., or s. 940.198 (2), 2023 stats.AB677,424Section 4. 48.685 (4m) (b) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB677,4,5148.685 (4m) (b) 2. That the person was charged for a violation of s. 948.02 (1) 2or (2), 948.025, 948.03 (2) or (5) (a) 1., 2., 3., or 4., 948.05, 948.051, 948.055, 948.06, 3948.07, 948.072, 948.08, 948.081, 948.085, 948.11 (2) (a) or (am), 948.12, 948.125, 4948.13, 948.21, 948.215, 948.30, or 948.53, or a similar law of another state, and the 5charge was dismissed or amended as part of a plea agreement.AB677,56Section 5. 48.685 (4m) (b) 2m. of the statutes is amended to read:AB677,4,11748.685 (4m) (b) 2m. That the person has pleaded no contest to a violation of s. 8948.02 (1) or (2), 948.025, 948.03 (2) or (5) (a) 1., 2., 3., or 4., 948.05, 948.051, 9948.055, 948.06, 948.07, 948.072, 948.08, 948.081, 948.085, 948.11 (2) (a) or (am), 10948.12, 948.125, 948.13, 948.21, 948.215, 948.30, or 948.53, or a similar law of 11another state.AB677,612Section 6. 50.065 (1) (e) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB677,4,201350.065 (1) (e) 2. For the purposes of an entity that serves persons under the 14age of 18, “serious crime” includes a violation of s. 948.02 (2), 948.03 (2) (b) or (c) or 15(5) (a) 4., 948.05, 948.051, 948.055, 948.06, 948.07, 948.072, 948.08, 948.085, 948.11 16(2) (a) or (am), 948.12, 948.125, 948.13, 948.21 (2), 948.215, 948.30, or 948.53 or a 17violation of the law of any other state or United States jurisdiction that would be a 18violation of s. 948.02 (2), 948.03 (2) (b) or (c) or (5) (a) 4., 948.05, 948.051, 948.055, 19948.06, 948.07, 948.072, 948.08, 948.085, 948.11 (2) (a) or (am), 948.12, 948.125, 20948.13, 948.21 (2), 948.30, or 948.53 if committed in this state.AB677,721Section 7. 51.20 (13) (ct) 2m. of the statutes is amended to read:AB677,5,82251.20 (13) (ct) 2m. If the subject individual is before the court on a petition 23filed under a court order under s. 938.30 (5) (c) 1. and is found to have committed a 24violation, or to have solicited, conspired, or attempted to commit a violation, of s. 1940.22 (2), 940.225 (1), (2), or (3), 944.06, 948.02 (1) or (2), 948.025, 948.05, 948.051, 2948.055, 948.06, 948.07, 948.072, 948.075, 948.08, 948.085, 948.095, 948.11 (2) (a) 3or (am), 948.12, 948.125, 948.13, or 948.30, of s. 940.302 (2) if s. 940.302 (2) (a) 1. b. 4applies, or of s. 940.30 or 940.31 if the victim was a minor and the subject individual 5was not the victim’s parent, the court shall require the individual to comply with 6the reporting requirements under s. 301.45 unless the court determines, after a 7hearing on a motion made by the individual, that the individual is not required to 8comply under s. 301.45 (1m).AB677,89Section 8. 103.34 (1) (b) 2. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 1024, section 93, is amended to read:AB677,5,2011103.34 (1) (b) 2. A violation of s. 940.01, 940.02, 940.03, 940.05, 940.06, 12940.07, 940.08, 940.09, 940.10, 940.21, 940.225 (1), (2), or (3), 940.23, 940.235, 13940.24, 940.25, 940.30, 940.302, 940.305, 940.31, 940.60 (2) or (3) (a), (b), or (c), 14940.66 (2), 943.02, 943.03, 943.04, 943.10, 943.30, 943.31, 943.32, 944.32, 944.34, 15946.10, 948.02 (1) or (2), 948.025, 948.03 (2), (3), or (5) (a) 1., 2., 3., or 4., 948.04, 16948.05, 948.051, 948.055, 948.06, 948.07, 948.072, 948.075, 948.08, 948.085, 948.11 17(2) (a) or (am), 948.12, 948.125, 948.13, 948.21 (2), 948.215, or 948.30 or s. 940.19 18(2), 2023 stats., s. 940.19 (4), 2023 stats., s. 940.19 (5), 2023 stats., s. 940.19 (6), 192023 stats., or s. 940.198 (2), 2023 stats., or of a substantially similar federal law or 20law of another state.AB677,921Section 9. 111.335 (1m) (b) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB677,5,2422111.335 (1m) (b) 1. A violation specified in ch. 940 or s. 948.02, 948.025, 23948.03, 948.05, 948.051, 948.055, 948.06, 948.07, 948.072, 948.075, 948.08, 24948.085, or 948.095.AB677,101Section 10. 111.335 (1m) (d) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB677,6,42111.335 (1m) (d) 1. A violation of s. 948.02 (1) or (2), 948.025, 948.03 (2) (a) or 3(c) or (5) (a) 1., 2., 3., or 4., 948.05, 948.051, 948.055, 948.07, 948.072, 948.08, 4948.085, 948.095, or 948.30 (2).AB677,115Section 11. 165.84 (7) (ab) 1. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin 6Act 24, section 93, is amended to read:AB677,6,127165.84 (7) (ab) 1. A felony violation of s. 940.01, 940.05, 940.21, 940.225 (1), 8(2), or (3), 940.235, 940.30, 940.302 (2), 940.305, 940.31, 940.32 (2), (2e), or (2m), 9940.43, 940.45, 940.66 (2), 941.20, 941.21, 941.327, 943.02, 943.06, 943.10, 943.23 10(2), 943.231 (1), 943.32, 948.02 (1) or (2), 948.025, 948.03 (2) (a) or (c) or (5) (a) 1., 2., 113., or 4., 948.05, 948.051, 948.055, 948.07, 948.072, 948.08, 948.085, 948.095, or 12948.30 (2) or s. 940.198 (2), 2023 stats.AB677,1213Section 12. 165.93 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB677,6,1614165.93 (1) (b) “Sexual assault” means conduct that is in violation of s. 15940.225, 948.02, 948.025, 948.03, 948.055, 948.06, 948.07, 948.072, 948.08, 16948.085, 948.09 or 948.10.AB677,1317Section 13. 301.046 (4) (b) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB677,6,2218301.046 (4) (b) (intro.) Before a prisoner is confined under sub. (1) for a 19violation of s. 940.03, 940.05, 940.225 (1) or (2), 948.02 (1) or (2), 948.025, 948.06, 20948.07, 948.072, or 948.085, the department shall make a reasonable attempt to 21notify all of the following persons, if they can be found, in accordance with par. (c) 22and after receiving a completed card under par. (d):AB677,1423Section 14. 301.048 (2) (bm) 1. a. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 24Wisconsin Act 24, section 93, is amended to read:AB677,7,121301.048 (2) (bm) 1. a. A crime specified in s. 940.19 (3), 1999 stats., s. 940.195 2(3), 1999 stats., s. 943.23 (1m), 1999 stats., s. 943.23 (1r), 1999 stats., s. 943.23 (1g), 32021 stats., s. 940.19 (4), 2023 stats., s. 940.19 (5), 2023 stats., s. 940.195 (4), 2023 4stats., s. 940.195 (5), 2023 stats., s. 940.198 (2), 2023 stats., s. 940.20, 2023 stats., s. 5940.201, 2023 stats., s. 940.203, 2023 stats., or s. 940.204, 2023 stats., or s. 940.01, 6940.02, 940.03, 940.05, 940.06, 940.08, 940.09, 940.10, 940.21, 940.225 (1) to (3), 7940.23, 940.235, 940.285 (2) (a) 1. or 2., 940.29, 940.295 (3) (b) 1g., 1m., 1r., 2., or 3., 8940.31, 940.43 (1) to (3), 940.45 (1) to (3), 940.60 (3) (a) or (b), 940.61, 940.62, 940.65 9(3) (a) or (b), 940.66 (2), 941.20 (2) or (3), 941.26, 941.30, 941.327, 943.01 (2) (c), 10943.011, 943.013, 943.02, 943.04, 943.06, 943.10 (2), 943.231 (1), 943.30, 943.32, 11946.43, 947.015, 948.02 (1) or (2), 948.025, 948.03, 948.04, 948.05, 948.051, 948.06, 12948.07, 948.072, 948.08, 948.085, or 948.30.AB677,1513Section 15. 301.048 (4m) (b) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB677,7,1914301.048 (4m) (b) (intro.) As soon as possible after a prisoner, probationer, 15parolee or person on extended supervision who has violated s. 940.03, 940.05, 16940.225 (1) or (2), 948.02 (1) or (2), 948.025, 948.06, 948.07, 948.072, or 948.085 17enters the intensive sanctions program, the department shall make a reasonable 18attempt to notify all of the following persons, if they can be found, in accordance 19with par. (c) and after receiving a completed card under par. (d):AB677,1620Section 16. 301.45 (1d) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB677,8,321301.45 (1d) (b) “Sex offense” means a violation, or the solicitation, conspiracy, 22or attempt to commit a violation, of s. 940.22 (2), 940.225 (1), (2) or (3), 944.06, 23944.18, 948.02 (1) or (2), 948.025, 948.05, 948.051, 948.055, 948.06, 948.07 (1) to (4), 24948.072, 948.075, 948.08, 948.085, 948.095, 948.11 (2) (a) or (am), 948.12, 948.125, 1948.13, or 948.30, of s. 940.302 (2) if s. 940.302 (2) (a) 1. b. applies, or of s. 940.30 or 2940.31 if the victim was a minor and the person who committed the violation was 3not the victim’s parent.AB677,174Section 17. 302.05 (3) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB677,8,75302.05 (3) (a) 1. The inmate is incarcerated regarding a violation other than a 6crime specified in ch. 940 or s. 948.02, 948.025, 948.03, 948.05, 948.051, 948.055, 7948.06, 948.07, 948.072, 948.075, 948.08, 948.085, or 948.095.AB677,188Section 18. 302.105 (2) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB677,8,159302.105 (2) (intro.) Before an inmate who is in a prison serving a sentence for 10a violation of s. 940.01, 940.03, 940.05, 940.225 (1) or (2), 948.02 (1) or (2), 948.025, 11948.06, 948.07, 948.072, or 948.085 is released from imprisonment because he or 12she has reached the expiration date of his or her sentence, the department shall 13make a reasonable attempt to notify all of the following persons, if they can be 14found, in accordance with sub. (3) and after receiving a completed card under sub. 15(4):AB677,1916Section 19. 302.11 (1g) (a) 2. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin 17Act 24, section 93, is amended to read:AB677,9,218302.11 (1g) (a) 2. Any felony under s. 940.09 (1), 1999 stats., s. 943.23 (1m), 191999 stats., s. 948.35 (1) (b) or (c), 1999 stats., s. 948.36, 1999 stats., s. 943.23 (1g), 202021 stats., s. 940.19 (5), 2023 stats., s. 940.195 (5), 2023 stats., or s. 940.198 (2), 212023 stats., or s. 940.02, 940.03, 940.05, 940.09 (1c), 940.21, 940.225 (1) or (2), 22940.305 (2), 940.31 (1) or (2) (b), 940.60 (3) (b), 940.65 (3) (b), 940.66 (2), 943.02, 23943.10 (2), 943.231 (1), 943.32 (2), 946.43 (1m), 948.02 (1) or (2), 948.025, 948.03 (2) 1(a) or (c) or (5) (a) 1., 2., 3., or 4., 948.05, 948.06, 948.07, 948.072, 948.08, or 948.30 2(2).AB677,203Section 20. 302.116 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB677,9,74302.116 (1) (a) “Serious sex offense” means a violation of s. 940.225 (1) or (2), 5948.02 (1) or (2), 948.025, 948.06, or 948.07, or 948.072 or a solicitation, conspiracy, 6or attempt to commit a violation of s. 940.225 (1) or (2), 948.02 (1) or (2), 948.025, 7948.06, 948.07, 948.072, or 948.085.AB677,218Section 21. 303.068 (4m) (b) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB677,9,149303.068 (4m) (b) (intro.) Before an inmate who is imprisoned for a violation of 10s. 940.01, 940.03, 940.05, 940.225 (1) or (2), 948.02 (1) or (2), 948.025, 948.06, 11948.07, 948.072, or 948.085 is released on leave under this section, the department 12shall make a reasonable attempt to notify all of the following persons, if they can be 13found, in accordance with par. (c) and after receiving a completed card under par. 14(d):AB677,2215Section 22. 304.06 (1) (d) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB677,9,2316304.06 (1) (d) 1. The notice under par. (c) shall inform the offices and persons 17under par. (c) 1. to 3. of the manner in which they may provide written statements 18under this subsection, shall inform persons under par. (c) 3. that they may attend 19interviews or hearings and make statements under par. (eg) and shall inform 20persons under par. (c) 3. who are victims, or family members of victims, of crimes 21specified in s. 940.01, 940.03, 940.05, 940.225 (1), (2), or (3), 948.02 (1) or (2), 22948.025, 948.06, or 948.07, or 948.072 of the manner in which they may have direct 23input in the parole decision-making process under par. (em). The parole 1commission shall provide notice under this paragraph for an inmate’s first 2application for parole and, upon request, for subsequent applications for parole. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab677 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab677 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB677 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB677 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB677: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting